Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2428
Affiliated licensees; powers and duties; immunity.

(1) All affiliated licensees to the extent allowed by their licenses shall have the same duties and responsibilities to the client and customer pursuant to sections 76-2417 to 76-2419 as the designated broker except as provided in section 76-2427.

(2) All affiliated licensees have the same protections from vicarious liability as their designated broker.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 28.